Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-905.01
Operator of Class II commercial underground injection well; duties.

An operator of a Class II commercial underground injection well shall sample and analyze the fluids injected into each disposal well at sufficiently frequent time intervals to yield data representative of fluid characteristics, but no less frequently than once annually. The operator shall submit a copy of the fluid analysis to the commission.

Laws 2016, LB1082, § 4.